Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2002
Annual statement; contents; filing.

Each of such associations shall file with the Secretary of State prior to February 1 of each year an annual statement for the previous calendar year. The statement shall contain (1) a list of its members, (2) names and addresses of its officers, and (3) an itemization of its receipts and disbursements.

Laws 1949, c. 2, § 2, p. 57.